Hawaii statutes.
§466J-2 Radiologic technology board;
appointment; duties. (a) The governor shall appoint and may remove in the
manner prescribed in section 26-34 a radiologic technology board, to be placed
in the department for administrative purposes.

(b) The board shall consist of ten members.
The membership shall be composed of:

(1) Two persons licensed to practice medicine or
osteopathic medicine pursuant to chapter 453 and certified by the American
Board of Radiology;

(2) Four persons, each with at least five years'
experience and certified in the practice of radiography, two of whom shall be
persons engaged in the hospital practice of radiography;

(3) One person with at least five years' experience
who is certified and engaged in the practice of radiation therapy technology;

(4) One person with at least five years' experience,
who is certified and engaged in the practice of nuclear medicine technology;

(5) One person from the general public; and

(6) The director or the director's designated
representative shall be the tenth, ex officio[,] voting member of the board.

(c) The board shall:

(1) Select its own chairperson from among its
members;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91 as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(3) Determine minimum standards for and approve
educational institutions that provide a course of instruction in radiologic
technology that meets the requirements of this chapter;

(4) Withdraw approval or deny approval of educational
institutions for failure to meet prescribed standards;

(5) Examine qualified applicants, grant, deny,
suspend, or revoke licenses, impose administrative remedies that are authorized
by this chapter, and impose such conditions as may be necessary in connection
with the granting, denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses;

(6) Keep a record of all its proceedings; and

(7) Make an annual report to the governor.

(d) Members of the board shall serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties. [L 1974, c 253, pt of §2;
am L 1980, c 128, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 273, §5; am L 1991, c 42,
§1; am L 1995, c 143, §3; am L 1996, c 202, §12; am L 2004, c 167, §1; am L
2009, c 11, §65]

Note

The 2009 amendment is retroactive to April 3, 2008. L 2009,
c 11, §76(2).

Cross References

Annual reports, due dates, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next